Washington statutes.
RCW 16.49.105

Noncompliance with chapter or rules—Civil penalty.

Any person who fails to comply with this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter may be subject to a civil penalty in an amount of not more than one thousand dollars per violation per day. Each violation is a separate and distinct offense.

All moneys collected for civil penalties under this chapter shall be deposited in the state general fund.

[ 2000 c 99 s 11; 1994 c 128 s 2; 1985 c 415 s 6; 1959 c 204 s 51. Formerly RCW 16.49.510.]